Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2632, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 129, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2632), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2632. A. To be eligible for an Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant, a student shall:
1. Be an Oklahoma a resident of this state as defined by the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;
2. Have enrolled as a full-time undergraduate student in an
eligible institution of higher education as prescribed in subsection
D of this section;
3. Meet the income eligibility level, which is the student’s
parents’ income from taxable sources which shall not be more than
Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) Eighty Thousand Dollars
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1272 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($80 ,000.00) per year or the student’s income if the student is
independent and self-supporting as determined by the State Regents
consistent with federal financial aid regulations;
4. Pay more tuition than is required at a comparable public
institution of higher education and pay no less than the regular
tuition required of all students enrolled at the institution where
in which the student is enrolled; and
5. Maintain at least minimum standards of academic performance
as required by the enrolling institution.
B. The enrolling institution shall forward a completed student
application, documentation of full-time enrollment status, and
certification of resident status to the State Regents no later than
October 15 for the fall semester and March 15 for the spring
semester of each academic year.
C. Subject to the availability of funds in the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Trust Fund, an Oklahoma Tuition Equalization
Grant in the amount of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per academic
year, or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per academic semester
shall be awarded by the State Regents by allocation from the
Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant Trust Fund, beginning with
eligible students enrolled in the 2003-2004 school year. No grants
pursuant to this act the Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant Act
shall be provided to students for attending summer terms or
intersessions.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1272 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. The State Regents shall implement policies and procedures
for the administration of this act the Oklahoma Tuition Equalization
Grant Act. The State Regents shall approve as eligible institutions
of higher education only those private or independent, not-for-
profit colleges or universities that are domiciled within this
state, meet approved program and accreditation standards as
determined by the State Regents, and are fully accredited by the
Higher Learning Commission of the North Central Association on
Colleges and Schools or a national accrediting body recognized by
the United States Department of Education. To be eligible,
institutions must shall have been granted not-for-profit status
granted by the Internal Revenue Service and the U. S. United States
Department of Education prior to July 1, 2012. Additionally,
eligible institutions shall adhere to the complaint process policies
and procedures administered by the State Regents. The State Regents
shall review and take action, as authorized, on complaints
concerning eligible institutions. The eligible institutions shall
include Family of Faith College, Mid-America Christian University,
Oklahoma Baptist University, Oklahoma Christian University, Oklahoma
City University, Oklahoma Wesleyan University, Oral Roberts
University, Southern Nazarene University, Southwestern Christian
University, the University of Tulsa, and Randall University.
E. If funds are not sufficient in the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Trust Fund to provide grants for all eligible
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1272 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

appl icants, the State Regents shall award grants on the basis of
need and take into consideration other grants and scholarships
received by an eligible applicant when awarding grants. Students
who have previously received a tuition equalization grant and who
continue to meet the requirements for eligibility shall have
absolute priority for continued financial support superior to any
student who is applying for a grant for the first time.
F. Students enrolling as first-time freshmen for the 2003-2004
school year shall be the first class of students eligible to apply
for Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grants. In subsequent years, all
previously eligible students and the first-time enrolling freshmen
students shall be entitled to apply for a grant pursuant to this
section. Beginning in the 2007-2008 school year, all eligible
students shall be entitled to apply for a grant pursuant to this
section.
G. A grant provided by pursuant to this section shall not be
allowed for courses or other postsecondary units taken in excess of
the requirements for completion of a baccalaureate program or taken
more than five (5) years after the student’s first grant is was
received. The State Regents may award an Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant for courses of postsecondary units taken more
than five (5) years after the student’s first grant is was received
only in hardship circumstances. No Oklahoma Tuition Equalization

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1272 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Gran t recipient may receive benefits beyond a cumulative time period
of five (5) years.
H. On or before February 1 after the first semester in which
grants are awarded pursuant to this act the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Act and every year thereafter, the State Regents
shall provide a report to the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives to include,
but not be limited, to the number of students awarded grants, and
the grade point average, persistence rates, degree completion rates,
demographic data, and any other indicators for such students the
State Regents deem appropriate.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1272 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)